Hawaii statutes.
§172-10 Enforcement of payment of expenses
by owners. The attorney general shall proceed, at any time after the
determination of the sum due as hereinbefore provided, to enforce payment of
the same by any proper proceedings brought in the name of the State in such
manner as provided for in sections 172-1 to 172-6, in the foreclosure of lien
for commutation. [L 1919, c 208, §4; am L 1923, c 155, §2; RL 1925, §567; RL
1935, §1693; RL 1945, §4640; RL 1955, §100-10; HRS §172-10]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next